tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Monitörü Aksesuarları: Renk Kalibrasyon Çizelgeleri; Renk Kalibrasyon Cihazları; Monitör Kolları ve Montaj Aparatları; Monitör Başlıkları ve Güneş Başlıkları; Monitör Işık Çubukları ve Arka Işıkları; Monitör Kılıfları ve Çantaları; Ekran Koruyucuları ve Filtreler
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Videopribor > Pribor za računalne monitore: Kartice za kalibraciju boja; Kalibratori boja; Krakovi i nosači za monitor; Sjenila za monitor; Svjetlosne trake i pozadinska rasvjeta za monitor; Futrole i torbe za monitor; Zaštite i filtri za zaslone
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Acessórios para vídeo > Acessórios para monitor de computador: Tabelas de calibração de cores; Calibradores de cor; Braços e suportes para monitor; Viseiras e protetores solares para monitor; Barras de luz e iluminação traseira para monitor; Capas e bolsas para monitor; Protetores de tela e filtros
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Accesorii video > Accesorii pentru monitoare calculator: Diagrame de calibrare a culorilor; Calibratoare de culoare; Brațe și suporturi pentru monitoare; Huse și parasolare pentru monitoare; Bare și lumini de fundal pentru monitoare; Huse și genți pentru monitoare; Protectoare și filtre pentru ecran
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Video príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k počítačovým monitorom: Kalibračné tabuľky farieb; Kalibrátory farieb; Ramená a držiaky monitorov; Clony a slnečné clony monitorov; Osvetľovacie lišty a podsvietenia monitorov; Púzdra a tašky na monitory; Ochranné fólie a filtre obrazovky
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Видео аксесоари > Аксесоари за компютърни монитори: Таблици за цветова калибрация; Цветни калибратори; Рамена и стойки за монитор; Сенници за монитор; Светлинни ленти и фоново осветление за монитор; Калъфи и чанти за монитор; Предпазители и филтри за екран
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Αξεσουάρ βίντεο > Αξεσουάρ οθονών υπολογιστή: Πίνακες βαθμονόμησης χρώματος; Βαθμονόμοι χρώματος; Βραχίονες & βάσεις οθόνης; Κουκούλες & αντηλιακά καλύμματα οθόνης; Μπάρες φωτισμού & οπίσθιος φωτισμός οθόνης; Θήκες & τσάντες οθόνης; Προστατευτικά & φίλτρα οθόνης
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo įrangos priedai > Kompiuterių monitorių priedai: Spalvų kalibravimo lentelės; Spalvų kalibratoriai; Monitorių laikikliai ir tvirtinimai; Monitorių gaubtai ir apsaugos nuo saulės; Monitorių šviesos juostos ir fono apšvietimas; Monitorių dėklai ir krepšiai; Ekrano apsaugos ir filtrai
cs: Elektronika > Video > Videopříslušenství > Počítačové monitory – příslušenství: Kalibrační barevné tabulky; Kalibrační sondy; Ramena a držáky monitorů; Stínítka a sluneční clony monitorů; Světelné lišty a podsvícení monitorů; Pouzdra a tašky na monitory; Ochranné fólie a filtry obrazovky
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 視訊配件 > 電腦螢幕配件: 色彩校準圖表; 色彩校正器; 顯示器臂及安裝架; 顯示器遮光罩; 顯示器燈條及背光; 顯示器套及袋; 螢幕保護膜及過濾器
es: Electrónica > Video > Accesorios de vídeo > Accesorios para monitores de computadora: Cartas de calibración de color; Calibradores de color; Brazos y soportes de monitor; Capuchas de monitor y parasoles; Barras de luz y retroiluminación de monitor; Fundas y bolsas de monitor; Protectores y filtros de pantalla
it: Elettronica > Video > Accessori video > Accessori monitor computer: Tavole di calibrazione del colore; Calibratori colore; Bracci e supporti del monitor; Visiere del monitor e parasole; Barre di illuminazione e retroilluminazione del monitor; Custodie e borse per monitor; Protezioni e filtri dello schermo
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Аксессуары для видеоаппаратуры > Аксессуары для компьютерных мониторов: Таблицы калибровки цвета; Калибраторы цвета; Кронштейны и крепления для мониторов; Бленды и солнцезащитные козырьки для мониторов; Подсветки и световые панели для мониторов; Чехлы и сумки для мониторов; Защитные пленки и фильтры для экранов
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 비디오 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 모니터 부대용품: 색상 캘리브레이션 차트; 색상 캘리브레이터; 모니터 암 및 마운트; 모니터 후드 및 선 후드; 모니터 라이트 바 및 백라이트; 모니터 슬리브 및 가방; 화면 보호 필름 및 필터
de: Elektronik > Video > Videozubehör > Computerbildschirmzubehör: Farbkalibrierungsdiagramme; Farbkalibrierung; Monitorarme und -halterungen; Monitorhauben und -sonnenblenden; Monitor-Lichtleisten und -Hintergrundbeleuchtungen; Monitorhüllen und -taschen; Bildschirmschutzfolien und -filter
nl: Elektronica > Video > Videoaccessoires > Accessoires voor computerbeeldschermen: Kleurkalibratie-diagrammen; Kleurmeters; Monitorarmen en bevestigingen; Monitorkappen en zonkappen; Monitor-lichtbalken en achtergrondverlichting; Monitorhoezen en tassen; Schermbeschermers en filters
en: Electronics > Video > Video Accessories > Computer Monitor Accessories: Color Calibration Charts; Color Calibrators; Monitor Arms & Mounts; Monitor Hoods & Sun Hoods; Monitor Light Bars & Backlights; Monitor Sleeves & Bags; Screen Protectors & Filters
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videotarvikkeet > Tietokonemonitorien lisätarvikkeet: Värikalibrointikaavio; Värikalibraattorit; Näyttövarsi ja teline; Näyttöhuppu ja aurinkosuoja; Näyttövalokisko ja taustavalo; Näyttösuoja ja laukku; Näytönsuoja ja suodatin
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videókiegészítők > Számítógépmonitor-kiegészítők: Színkalibráló táblázatok; Színkalibrátorok; Monitorkarok és -tartók; Monitorernyők és -napellenzők; Monitor-világítósávok és -háttérvilágítások; Monitortokok és -táskák; Képernyővédők és -szűrők
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Video dodatki > Dodatki za računalniške zaslone: Grafikoni za barvno kalibracijo; Barvni kalibratorji; Nosilne roke in nosilci za monitorje; Senčniki za monitorje; Svetlobne letve in osvetlitev ozadja za monitorje; Prevleke in torbe za monitorje; Zaščitne folije in filtri za zaslone
sv: Elektronik > Video > Videotillbehör > Tillbehör till datorskärmar: Färgkalibreringsdiagram; Färgkalibratorer; Skärmarmar och -fästen; Skärmhuvar och solskydd; Skärmljuslister och bakgrundsbelysning; Skärmfodral och -väskor; Skärmskydd och -filter
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > 映像機器関連用品 > PCモニター関連用品: カラーキャリブレーションチャート; カラーキャリブレーター; モニターアームとマウント; モニターフードとサンフード; モニターライトバーとバックライト; モニタースリーブとバッグ; スクリーンプロテクターとフィルター
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Acessórios vídeo > Acessórios de monitor de computador: Cartas de calibração de cor; Calibradores de cor; Braços e suportes de monitor; Coberturas e palas de monitor; Barras de luz e retroiluminação de monitor; Capas e sacos de monitor; Protetores e filtros de ecrã
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Phụ kiện hình ảnh > Phụ kiện màn hình máy tính: Bảng hiệu chuẩn màu; Thiết bị hiệu chỉnh màu sắc; Cánh tay và giá gắn màn hình; Nắp và nắp chống nắng màn hình; Thanh đèn và đèn nền màn hình; Túi và vỏ bảo vệ màn hình; Tấm bảo vệ và bộ lọc màn hình
pl: Elektronika > Video > Akcesoria do wideo > Akcesoria do monitorów komputerowych: Wykresy kalibracji barw; Kalibratory kolorów; Ramiona i uchwyty do monitorów; Osłony monitorów i osłony słoneczne; Paski oświetlające monitory i podświetlenia; Rękawki i torby do monitorów; Osłony ekranu i filtry
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Accessoires vidéo > Accessoires pour écrans d’ordinateur: Chartes d’étalonnage des couleurs; Kits de calibrage des couleurs; Bras et supports de moniteur; Capots et pare-soleil de moniteur; Barres lumineuses et rétroéclairages de moniteur; Housses et sacs de moniteur; Protecteurs d’écran et filtres
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > อุปกรณ์วิดีโอ > อุปกรณ์จอภาพคอมพิวเตอร์: แผ่นปรับค่าสี; เครื่องปรับระดับสี; ขาจับและขาตั้งมอนิเตอร์; ครอบกันแสงมอนิเตอร์; แถบไฟและไฟแบ็คไลท์มอนิเตอร์; ซองและกระเป๋ามอนิเตอร์; ฟิล์มกันรอยและแผ่นกรองหน้าจอ
da: Elektronik > Video > Video – tilbehør > Computerskærm – tilbehør: Farvekalibreringskort; Farvekalibrering; Skærmarme og -beslag; Skærmhætter og solskærme; Skærmlysstave og bagbelysning; Skærmhylstre og -tasker; Skærmbeskyttere og -filtre
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Videotilbehør > Tilbehør til dataskjermer: Fargekalibreringsdiagrammer; Fargekalibratorer; Skjermarmer og -fester; Hetter og solskjermer til skjerm; Lyslister og bakgrunnsbelysning til skjerm; Skjermdeksler og -vesker; Skjermbeskyttere og -filtre
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 摄影摄像配件 > 计算机显示器配件: 色彩校准卡; 颜色校准器; 显示器支臂和支架; 显示器遮光罩; 显示器灯条和背光灯; 显示器保护套/包; 屏幕保护膜和滤光片